North Carolina, session 2025, HB959.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Part 3A of Article 8 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is
amended by adding a new section to read:
"§ 115C-102.10. Internet safety policy.
Local boards of education shall adopt policies for student access to the internet on devices or
internet services provided by the local school administrative unit. The policies shall do at least
the following:
(1) Limit access by students to only age-appropriate subject matter and materials.
(2) Protect the safety and security of students when accessing email, chat rooms,
and other forms of electronic communication.
(3) Prohibit unauthorized access by students to data or information maintained by
the local school administrative unit, including by "hacking" and other
unlawful online activities.
(4) Prevent access to websites, web applications, or software that do not protect
against the disclosure, use, or dissemination of a student's personal
information.
(5) Prohibit and prevent students from accessing social media platforms, except
when expressly directed by a teacher solely for educational purposes."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 115C-47 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(70) To Adopt an Internet Safety Policy. – Local boards of education shall adopt
policies for internet safety in accordance with G.S. 115C-102.10."
SECTION 1.(c) This section is effective when it becomes law. Local boards of
education shall adopt the policies required by this section by January 1, 2026.
SECTION 2.(a) Part 1 of Article 8 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is
amended by adding a new section to read:
"§ 115C-81.26. Social media and mental health.
The standard course of study shall include instruction on social media and its effects on
health, including social, emotional, and physical effects. Instruction shall be provided once
during elementary school, once during middle school, and twice during high school. Instruction
on this topic shall include at least the following:
(1) Negative effects of social media on mental health, including addiction.
(2) The distribution of misinformation on social media.
(3) Methods of manipulating behavior using social media.
*H959-v-4*

(4) The permanency of information shared online.
(5) How to maintain personal security.
(6) How to identify cyberbullying, predatory behavior, and human trafficking on
the internet.
(7) How to report suspicious behavior encountered on the internet.
(8) Personal and interpersonal skills or character education that enhances
individual level protective factors and mitigates or reduces risk-taking or
harmful behavior."
SECTION 2.(b) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning
with the 2026-2027 school year.
SECTION 3.(a) Article 7B of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new Part to read:
"Part 8. Miscellaneous Requirements.
"§ 115C-76.100. Regulation of wireless communication devices.
(a) The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Wireless communication device. – Any portable wireless device that has the
capability to provide voice, messaging, or other data communication between
two or more parties, including the following:
a. Cellular telephones.
b. Tablet computers.
c. Laptop computers.
d. Paging devices.
e. Two-way radios.
f. Gaming devices.
(2) Wireless communication policy. – A policy governing the use of wireless
communication devices by students.
(b) The governing body of a public school unit shall establish a wireless communication
policy. At a minimum, except as permitted in subsection (c) of this section, the policy shall
prohibit students from using, displaying, or having a wireless communication device turned on
during instructional time.
(c) A wireless communication policy shall allow student use of a wireless communication
device during instructional time as follows:
(1) If authorized by a teacher for educational purposes or for use in the event of
an emergency. The governing body may establish parameters to be followed
by a teacher in granting authorizations.
(2) As required by the student's individualized education program or section 504
(29 U.S.C. § 794) plan.
(3) As required to manage a student's health care, in accordance with a
documented medical condition.
(d) The governing body shall establish the consequences for violations of the wireless
communication policy, which may include confiscation of the wireless communication device
and disciplinary measures under the public school unit's Code of Student Conduct.
(e) No later than September 1 of the year in which this section becomes effective, every
public school unit shall send to the Department of Public Instruction a copy of the public school
unit's wireless communication policy. The public school unit shall provide the Department of
Public Instruction with a copy of the wireless communication policy anytime it is changed. No
later than October 1 of each year, the Department of Public Instruction shall report to the Joint
Legislative Education Oversight Committee the number of public school units that are in
compliance with this section and the name of any public school unit which is not in compliance
with this section."
Page 2 House Bill 959-Ratified

SECTION 3.(b) This section is effective when it becomes law. Governing bodies of
public school units shall adopt the policies required by this section by January 1, 2026.
SECTION 4.(a) G.S. 115C-270.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-270.1. Definitions.
As used in this Article, the following definitions shall apply:
…
(1b) Individualized education program (IEP). – As defined in G.S. 115C-106.3.
(2) Professional educator. – An administrator, teacher, or student services
personnel.
(3) Recognized educator preparation program or recognized EPP. – As defined in
G.S. 115C-269.1(15).
(3a) Related services. – As defined in G.S. 115C-106.3.
(3b) Special education. – As defined in G.S. 115C-106.3.
…."
SECTION 4.(b) G.S. 115C-270.20(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) Teacher Licenses. – The State Board shall adopt rules for the issuance of the following
classes of teacher licenses, including required levels of preparation for each classification:
…
(5) Residency License or RL. – A one-year license, renewable twice, that meets
both of the following requirements:
a. Is requested by the governing body of a public school unit an eligible
entity and accompanied by a certification of supervision from the
recognized educator preparation program in which the individual is
enrolled. For the purposes of this sub-subdivision, an eligible entity is
one of the following:
1. The governing body of a public school unit.
2. A nonpublic school that meets all of the following:
I. Meets the requirements of Part 1 or Part 2 of Article 39
of this Chapter.
II. Is approved and monitored by the Department of Public
Instruction to provide special education and related
services pursuant to a student's IEP.
b. The individual for whom the license is requested meets all of the
following requirements:
1. Holds at least one of the following:
I. A bachelor's degree.
II. An advanced degree.
2. Has either completed coursework relevant to the requested
licensure area or passed the content area examination relevant
to the requested licensure area that has been approved by the
State Board.
3. Is enrolled in a recognized educator preparation program.
4. Meets all other requirements established by the State Board,
including completing preservice requirements prior to
teaching.
…."
SECTION 4.(c) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies to
applications for residency licenses occurring on or after that date.
SECTION 5.(a) Notwithstanding any law or rule to the contrary, the Criminal Justice
Education and Training Standards Commission shall allow any school that has received a
House Bill 959-Ratified Page 3

suspension of its accreditation for a term of at least four years to apply for reaccreditation
pursuant to 12 NCAC 09C .0401 after two years of suspension.
SECTION 5.(b) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies to any
suspension of accreditation by the Criminal Justice Education and Training Standards
Commission occurring on or before the effective date.
SECTION 6. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
In the General Assembly read three times and ratified this the 26th day of June, 2025.
s/ Rachel Hunt
President of the Senate
s/ Destin Hall
Speaker of the House of Representatives
_____________________________________
Josh Stein
Governor
Approved __________.m. this ______________ day of ___________________, 2025
Page 4 House Bill 959-Ratified